Washington statutes.
RCW 3.62.100

Promotion of efficiency.

District courts shall take all steps necessary to promote efficiencies in calendaring in order to minimize costs to cities that use the district courts. Cities shall cooperate with the district courts in order to minimize those costs.

[ 1993 c 317 s 7.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1993 c 317: See notes following RCW 3.50.810.